verb/verb-vchg.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Verbs with Vowel Change
! Author: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013

Multichar_Symbols +Verb +PresInd +ImpInd +Cond +Con +Impv +Inf +Gerund +PastPart +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl
+Pron +Pers +Masc +Fem +MF +Nom ^| +Apo *IGL *LA *INS *EL

! The forms are divided into 3 stems:
! 1. Infinitive (Verbs in -er also show vowel change in infinitive)
! 2. Present with vowel change, conjunctive, imperative
! 3. Present without vowel change, imperfect, conditional, imperative, gerund
! These verbs are listed in Caduff&Caprez in article 127

LEXICON Root
!----- Verbs in -ar: -----
acclamar:acclam		Stem13Ar;	acclamar:acclom		Stem2;
accumadar:accumad	Stem13Ar;	accumadar:accumod	Stem2;
accumpagnar:accumpagn	Stem13Ar;	accumpagnar:accumpogn	Stem2;
bagnar:bagn			Stem13Ar;	bagnar:bogn		Stem2;
chamar:cham			Stem13Ar;	chamar:chaum		Stem2;
clamar:clam			Stem13Ar;	clamar:clom			Stem2;
clapragnar:clapragn Stem13Ar;	clapragnar:claprogn	Stem2;
cresmar:cresm		Stem13Ar;	cresmar:craism		Stem2;
crudar:crud			Stem13Ar;	crudar:crod 		Stem2;
cumadar:cumad		Stem13Ar;	cumadar:cumod		Stem2;
cumandar:cumand		Stem13Ar;	cumandar:cumond		Stem2;
cumpagnar:cumpagn	Stem13Ar;	cumpagnar:cumpogn	Stem2;
depurtar:depurt		Stem13Ar;	depurtar:deport		Stem2;
dumagnar:dumagn		Stem13Ar;	dumagnar:dumogn		Stem2;
dumandar:dumand		Stem13Ar;	dumandar:dumond		Stem2;
dustar:dust			Stem13Ar;	dustar:dost			Stem2;
duvrar:duvr			Stem13Ar;	duvrar:dovr			Stem2;
empruvar:empruv		Stem13Ar;	empruvar:emprov		Stem2;
empurtar:empurt 	Stem13Ar;	empurtar:emport		Stem2;
empustar:empust		Stem13Ar;	empustar:empost		Stem2;
enchadanar:enchadan	Stem13Ar;	enchadanar:enchadain	Stem2;
engianar:engian		Stem13Ar;	engianar:engion		Stem2;
engular:engul		Stem13Ar;	engular:engol		Stem2;
ennavar:ennav		Stem13Ar;	ennavar:ennaiv		Stem2;
enrullar:enrull		Stem13Ar;	enrullar:enroll		Stem2;
entupar:entup		Stem13Ar;	entupar:entaup		Stem2;
exclamar:exclam		Stem13Ar;	exclamar:exclom		Stem2;
fanar:fan			Stem13Ar;	fanar:fain			Stem2;
giugar:giug			Stem13Ar;	giugar:giog			Stem2;
intschensar:intschens	Stem13Ar;	intschensar:intschains	Stem2;

prezavrar:prezavr		Stem13Ar;	prezavrar:prezaivr		Stem2;
premaschadar:premaschad		Stem13Ar;	premaschadar:premaschaid		Stem2;
spruvar:spruv		Stem13Ar;	spruvar:sprov		Stem2;
struclar:strucl		Stem13Ar;	struclar:strocl		Stem2;

stgavagnar:stgavagn		Stem13Ar;	stgavagnar:stgavogn		Stem2;
maschadar:maschad	Stem13Ar;	maschadar:maschaid	Stem2;
franar:fran			Stem13Ar;	franar:frain		Stem2;
fufragnar:fufragn	Stem13Ar;	fufragnar:fufrogn	Stem2;
furar:fur			Stem13Ar;	furar:for			Stem2;
gudagnar:gudagn		Stem13Ar;	gudagnar:gudogn		Stem2;
inflammar:inflamm	Stem13Ar;	inflammar:inflom	Stem2;
luar:lu				Stem13Ar;	luar:lieu			Stem2;
ludar:lud			Stem13Ar;	ludar:laud			Stem2;
lugar:lug			Stem13Ar;	lugar:log			Stem2;
malduvrar:malduvr	Stem13Ar;	malduvrar:maldovr	Stem2;
manar:man			Stem13Ar;	manar:main			Stem2;
mular:mul			Stem13Ar;	mular:mol			Stem2;
nudar:nud			Stem13Ar;	nudar:nod			Stem2;
ordinar:ordin		Stem13Ar;	ordinar:ordain		Stem2;
palesar:pales		Stem13Ar;	palesar:palais		Stem2;
palpagnar:palpagn	Stem13Ar;	palpagnar:palpogn		Stem2;
pasar:pas			Stem13Ar;	pasar:pais			Stem2;
perfurar:perfur		Stem13Ar;	perfurar:perfor		Stem2;
pruvar:pruv			Stem13Ar;	pruvar:prov			Stem2;
purtar:purt			Stem13Ar;	purtar:port 		Stem2;
pusar:pus			Stem13Ar;	pusar:pos			Stem2;
pussar:puss			Stem13Ar;	pussar:pauss		Stem2;
reclamar:reclam		Stem13Ar;	reclamar:reclom		Stem2;
recumandar:recumand	Stem13Ar;	recumandar:recumond	Stem2;
remanar:reman		Stem13Ar;	remanar:remain		Stem2;
renudar:renud		Stem13Ar;	renudar:renod		Stem2;
repussar:repuss		Stem13Ar;	repussar:repauss	Stem2;
ruassar:ruass		Stem13Ar;	ruassar:ruauss		Stem2;
sbuvar:sbuv			Stem13Ar;	sbuvar:sbov			Stem2;
schlugar:schlug		Stem13Ar;	schlugar:schlog		Stem2;
schlugnar:schlugn	Stem13Ar;	schlugnar:schlogn	Stem2;
schluppar:schlupp	Stem13Ar;	schluppar:schlopp	Stem2;
scrudar:scrud		Stem13Ar;	scrudar:scrod		Stem2;
scumandar:scumand	Stem13Ar;	scumandar:scumond	Stem2;
sdermanar:sderman	Stem13Ar;	sdermanar:sdermain	Stem2;
sfurzar:sfurz		Stem13Ar; 	sfurzar:sforz		Stem2;
sgiamiar:sgiami		Stem13Ar;	sgiamiar:sgiomi		Stem2;
sgramar:sgram		Stem13Ar;	sgramar:sgrom		Stem2;
sgular:sgul			Stem13Ar;	sgular:sgol			Stem2;
smanar:sman			Stem13Ar;	smanar:smain		Stem2;
smular:smul			Stem13Ar;	smular:smol			Stem2;
splattergnar:splattergn		Stem13Ar;	splattergnar:splattrogn		Stem2;
spular:spul			Stem13Ar;	spular:spol			Stem2;
spustar:spust		Stem13Ar;	spustar:spost		Stem2;
stgamiar:stgami		Stem13Ar;	stgamiar:stgomi		Stem2;
stuppar:stupp		Stem13Ar;	stuppar:staup		Stem2;
stuschar:stusch		Stem13Ar;	stuschar:stausch	Stem2;
suandar:suand		Stem13Ar;	suandar:suond		Stem2;
surdumandar:surdumand	Stem13Ar;	surdumandar:surdumond	Stem2;
surduvrar:surduvr	Stem13Ar;	surduvrar:surdovr	Stem2;
surmanar:surman		Stem13Ar;	surmanar:surmain	Stem2;
tadlar:tadl			Stem13Ar;	tadlar:taidl		Stem2;
tartagnar:tartagn	Stem13Ar;	tartagnar:tartogn		Stem2;
telecumandar:telecumand	Stem13Ar;	telecumandar:telecumond	Stem2;
trafurar:trafur		Stem13Ar;	trafurar:trafor	Stem2;
tschanar:tschan		Stem13Ar;	tschanar:tschain	Stem2;
tschufragnar:tschufragn	Stem13Ar;	tschufragnar:tschufrogn	Stem2;
tuffar:tuff			Stem13Ar;	tuffar:tof	Stem2;
uvar:uv				Stem13Ar;	uvar:ov				Stem2;
vannar:vann			Stem13Ar;   vannar:vonn			Stem2;
zaccagnar:zaccagn	Stem13Ar;   zaccagnar:zaccogn	Stem2;
pulstrar:pulstr		Stem13Ar;   pulstrar:polstr	Stem2;
regurdar:regurd		Stem13Ar;   regurdar:regord	Stem2;
platschergnar:platschergn		Stem13Ar;   platschergnar:platschrogn	Stem2;
rudlar:rudl		Stem13Ar;   rudlar:rodl	Stem2;
rugar:rug		Stem13Ar;   rugar:rog	Stem2;
rullar:rull		Stem13Ar;   rullar:rol	Stem2;



!----- Verbs in -ir: -----
durmir:durm			Stem13Ir;	durmir:dorm			Stem2;
emplenir:emplen		Stem13Ir;	emplenir:emplain	Stem2;
murir:mur			Stem13Ir;	murir:mor			Stem2;
surudir:surud		Stem13Ir;	surudir:suraud		Stem2;
udir:ud				Stem13Ir;	udir:aud			Stem2;
proseguir:prosegu	Stem13Ir;	proseguir:proseguel	Stem2;



!----- Verbs in -er: -----
baiver:bav			Stem3Er;	baiver:baiv			Stem12Er;
clauder:clud		Stem3Er;	clauder:claud		Stem12Er;
ensolver:ensulv		Stem3Er;	ensolver:ensolv		Stem12Er;
entaisser:entess	Stem3Er;	entaisser:entaiss	Stem12Er;
entschaiver:entschav	Stem3Er;	entschaiver:entschaiv	Stem12Er;
moler:mul			Stem3Er;	moler:mol			Stem12Er;
morder:murd 		Stem3Er;	morder:mord			Stem12Er;
mover:muv			Stem3Er;	mover:mov			Stem12Er;
naiver:nav			Stem3Er;	naiver:naiv			Stem12Er;
percorscher:percursch	Stem3Er;	percorscher:percorsch	Stem12Er;
pertschaiver:pertschav	Stem3Er;	pertschaiver:pertschaiv	Stem12Er;
plover:pluv			Stem3Er;	plover:plov			Stem12Er;
porscher:pursch		Stem3Er;	porscher:porsch		Stem12Er;
retschaiver:retschav	Stem3Er;	retschaiver:retschaiv	Stem12Er;
revolver:revulv		Stem3Er;	revolver:revolv		Stem12Er;
sclauder:sclud		Stem3Er;	sclauder:sclaud		Stem12Er;
smover:smuv			Stem3Er;	smover:smov			Stem12Er;
sponder:spund		Stem3Er;	sponder:spond		Stem12Er;
storscher:stursch	Stem3Er;	storscher:storsch	Stem12Er;
surbaiver:surbav	Stem3Er;	surbaiver:surbaiv	Stem12Er;
surporscher:surpursch	Stem3Er;	surporscher:surporsch	Stem12Er;
svolver:svulv		Stem3Er;	svolver:svolv		Stem12Er;
taisser:tess		Stem3Er;	taisser:taiss		Stem12Er;
torrer:turr			Stem3Er;	torrer:torr			Stem12Er;
volver:vulv			Stem3Er;	volver:volv			Stem12Er;
!----- Verbs in -air: -----
dulair:dul			Stem13Air;	dulair:dol			Stem2;
giudair:giud		Stem13Air;	giudair:giaud		Stem2;
rumagnair:rumagn	Stem13Air;	rumagnair:rumogn	Stem2;
surgiudair:surgiud	Stem13Air;	surgiudair:surgiaud	Stem2;
!----- Irregular forms of these verbs: -----
!	Irregular;


! Verb Class Division:
!=====================
! Verbs in -ar:
LEXICON Stem13Ar
+Verb+Inf:ar			# ;
+Verb+Gerund:ond		# ;
0:a						IndCondEnd;
0:a						IndPlEnd;
						PastPartA;

! Verbs in -ir:
LEXICON Stem13Ir
+Verb+Inf:ir			# ;
+Verb+Gerund:ind		# ;
0:i						IndCondEnd;
						IndPlEnd;
						PastPartI;

! Verbs in -air
LEXICON Stem13Air
+Verb+Inf:air			# ;
+Verb+Gerund:end		# ;
0:e						IndCondEnd;
0:a						IndPlEnd;
						PastPartI;

! Verbs in -er
LEXICON Stem12Er
+Verb+Inf:er			# ;
						Stem2;
LEXICON Stem3Er
+Verb+Gerund:end		# ;
0:e						IndCondEnd;
0:a						IndPlEnd;
						PastPartI;

! Endings for all Verbs (unstressed ending)
LEXICON Stem2
IndSgEnd;
ConjEnd;

! Endings for the Verbs (stressed ending)
LEXICON IndCondEnd
ImpEnd;
CondEnd;


! Endings:
!=========
! Present Indicative and Imperative (unstressed ending)
LEXICON IndSgEnd
+Verb+PresInd+1P+Sg:*EL	# ;
+Verb+PresInd+2P+Sg:as	# ;
+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg:a	# ;
+Verb+PresInd+3P+Pl:an	# ;
! Suffigated Forms:
+Verb+PresInd+1P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:*ELa	# ;
+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Sg:a'l	# ;
+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Fem+Sg:*LA'la	# ;
+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Sg:*IGLi	# ;
+Verb+PresInd+3P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Pl:ani	# ;
+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg+Apo:a*INS	#;
! Imperative
+Verb+Impv+2P+Sg:a		# ;



! Present Indicative and Imperative (stressed ending)
LEXICON IndPlEnd
+Verb+PresInd+1P+Pl:in	# ;
+Verb+PresInd+1P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Pl:insa	# ;
+Verb+PresInd+2P+Pl:is	# ;
! Imperative:
+Verb+Impv+2P+Pl:i		# ;


! Imperfect Indicative:
LEXICON ImpEnd
+Verb+ImpInd+1P+Sg:va	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+2P+Sg:vas	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Sg:va	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+1P+Pl:van	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+2P+Pl:vas	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Pl:van	# ;
!! Suffigated Forms:
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Sg+Apo:v'	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Sg:va'l	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Fem+Sg:v'la	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Sg:vi		# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+1P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Pl:vansa	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Pl:vani	# ;


! Conjunctive
LEXICON ConjEnd
+Verb+Con+1P+Sg:ia		# ;
+Verb+Con+2P+Sg:ias	# ;
+Verb+Con+3P+Sg:ia		# ;
+Verb+Con+1P+Pl:ian	# ;
+Verb+Con+2P+Pl:ias	# ;
+Verb+Con+3P+Pl:ian	# ;
!! Suffigated Forms:
+Verb+Con+3P+Sg+Apo:ian	# ;
+Verb+Con+1P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Pl:iansa	#;
+Verb+Con+3P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Pl:iani	#;


! Conditional:
LEXICON CondEnd
+Verb+Cond+1P+Sg:ss		# ;
+Verb+Cond+2P+Sg:ssas	# ;
+Verb+Cond+3P+Sg:ss		# ;
+Verb+Cond+1P+Pl:ssan	# ;
+Verb+Cond+2P+Pl:ssas	# ;
+Verb+Cond+3P+Pl:ssan	# ;
!! Suffigated Foms:
+Verb+Cond+1P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:ssa	#;
+Verb+Cond+3P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Sg:ssi	#;
+Verb+Cond+1P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Pl:ssansa	#;
+Verb+Cond+3P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Pl:ssani	#;

! Past Participle -ar-Verbs
LEXICON PastPartA
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Sg:à #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Sg:ada #;
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Pl:ads #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Pl:adas #;

! Past Participle -air, -er, -ir-Verbs
LEXICON PastPartI
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Sg:ì #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Sg:ida #;
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Pl:ids #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Pl:idas #;


! Some irregular or double forms:
!================================
!LEXICON Irregular
